Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 1

Commission on Firefighting Personnel Standards and Education

4-24-101. Creation.

There is hereby created the commission on firefighting personnel standards and education.

The commission shall be attached to the department of commerce and insurance, division of fire prevention, and the division shall serve as a fiscal agent for the commission.

Acts 1974, ch. 726, § 1; 1976, ch. 706, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-2401; Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 41.

Compiler's Notes. The regulatory board created by this section is attached to the division of regulatory boards in the department of commerce and insurance for purposes of administration. See §§4-3-1304 and title 56, ch. 1, part 3.

The Commission on firefighting personnel standards and education, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2025. See §§4-29-112,4-29-246.

Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 48 provided that all rules, regulations, orders, and decisions heretofore issued or promulgated by any of the boards or commissions, which the act terminates or merges into another board or commission, shall remain in full force and effect. In the case of the boards or commissions that are merged with another board or commission by the act, all final rules, regulations, orders, and decisions together with any matters that are pending on October 1, 2012, shall hereafter be administered, enforced, modified, or rescinded in accordance with the law applicable to the continuing board or commission.

Attorney General Opinions. The authority to certify firefighters is vested exclusively in the commission on firefighting personnel standards and education; the Fire Service and Codes Enforcement Academy cannot provide such certification, OAG 01-008, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 10 (1/25/01).

4-24-102. Recommendations to governor and general assembly.

The commission shall recommend to the governor and the general assembly standards of performance, courses of instruction and training, and procedures for certifying levels of achievement for full-time municipal and volunteer firefighters.

Acts 1974, ch. 726, § 2; 1979, ch. 258, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-2402.

Attorney General Opinions. The authority to certify firefighters is vested exclusively in the commission on firefighting personnel standards and education; the Fire Service and Codes Enforcement Academy cannot provide such certification, OAG 01-008, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 10 (1/25/01).

4-24-103. Quorum — Officers.

Five (5) members shall constitute a quorum.

In July of each even-numbered year, the commission shall elect from its membership a chair, a vice chair, and a secretary.

Acts 1974, ch. 726, § 3; T.C.A., § 4-2403.

4-24-104. Members.

The commission shall be composed of nine (9) members, appointed by the governor as provided in this section. The commissioner of commerce and insurance and the executive director of the fire service and codes enforcement academy shall be ex officio nonvoting members.

Each appointed member, with the exception of volunteer members, shall be qualified by experience in the area of fire protection and related fields, meet the minimum training requirements of § 4-24-112, be a certified firefighter II or above, and be an active or retired member of a fire department currently participating in the commission's certification training program.

Each appointed volunteer member shall be qualified by experience; extinguish and control fires and fire-related emergencies as a member of a volunteer fire department recognized under title 68, chapter 102, part 3; meet the minimum training requirements of § 4-24-112; currently serve or has served as a training officer for a fire department; and not be considered a full-time employee of the fire department that they are representing.

Three (3) members appointed to the commission shall be selected from candidates submitted collectively by the Tennessee Fire Chief's Association, the Tennessee Fire Safety Inspectors Association, and the Tennessee Fireman's Association. One (1) of the members appointed pursuant to this subdivision (c)(1) shall be a volunteer firefighter.

Three (3) members appointed to the commission shall be selected from candidates submitted by the governing body of the Tennessee Professional Firefighters Association.

Three (3) members appointed to the commission shall be appointed by the governor. One (1) appointment shall be a career firefighter and one (1) appointment shall be a volunteer firefighter.

The appointments shall be made in accordance with the following procedure:

Within two (2) weeks after the occurrence of a vacancy in the office of any commissioner caused by death, resignation, disability, or forfeiture of office, and no later than thirty (30) days prior to the expiration of the term of office of any incumbent commissioner, the chair of the commission shall notify the appropriate association of the vacancy or expiration of the term when the vacancy or expiration results in an opening for that particular association to make recommendations for an appointment;

Within twenty-one (21) days after the receipt of such notice, the governing body of the association may submit to the governor a list of three (3) qualified nominees to fill such vacancy, in order of preference;

Within twenty-one (21) days after the submission of the list or after the time for submission of the list has expired, the governor may appoint one (1) of the nominees for the remainder of the term, or for the next term, as the case may be; provided, that the governor may reject all nominees by written objection mailed to the association within the twenty-one-day period, in which event the governing board of the association shall have twenty-one (21) days from receipt of the written objection within which to submit a second list of three (3) appointees in order of preference, and the governor may likewise reject all such nominees by written objection in the manner provided in this subdivision (c)(4)(C), in which event the procedure of objection by the governor and certification of additional names by the governing body of the association shall continue until the position is filled;

In the event the governor fails to exercise the governor's executive power or power to object within the applicable twenty-one-day period, then the first name listed on the last list of recommended nominees shall be the appointee by operation of law; and

In the event the governing body of the association fails to submit a list of qualified nominees as provided in this subsection (c), the governor may proceed to appoint a person meeting the qualifications for the position.

In making appointments to the commission, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person appointed to serve on the commission is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person appointed to serve on the commission is a member of a racial minority.

Commission members shall be appointed for six-year terms.

The governor shall fill by appointment vacancies occurring during terms.

Each grand division shall be represented on the commission.

A member whose term expires shall continue to serve on the commission until a new member is appointed.

With the exception of the executive director of the fire service and codes enforcement academy or the executive director's designee, who serves as a nonvoting member and whose attendance does not count towards a quorum, no state employee, including full-time and part-time employees, shall be appointed to serve on the commission. This subsection (i) shall not affect the terms of the members of the commission appointed prior to April 11, 2007, but all appointments made on or after April 11, 2007, shall meet the requirements established in this subsection (i).

Acts 1974, ch. 726, § 4; 1979, ch. 258, § 2; T.C.A., § 4-2404; Acts 1986, ch. 824, § 1; 1988, ch. 1013, § 7; 2003, ch. 249, § 1; 2004, ch. 427, § 1; 2007, ch. 16, § 1; 2010, ch. 1150, § 1.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Attorney General Opinions. It does not present any conflict of interest for an instructor at the fire service and codes academy to serve on the commission on fire fighting personnel standards commission, OAG 06-114 (7/19/06), 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 123.

4-24-105. Per diem payments and expenses.

Commission members shall receive a per diem payment for each day of attendance at a local firefighting unit pursuant to § 4-24-110, or a meeting of the commission pursuant to § 4-24-107, in the amount of fifty dollars ($50.00) per day of attendance.

Members shall receive a prorated share of such per diem payment for less than a full day's attendance.

A travel and expense allowance, consistent with state travel policy, shall be paid from the member's home to the location of the firefighting unit, or meeting of the commission, and return.

The payment of such per diem and travel allowance expense shall be subject to funding being available in the budget of the commission for the fiscal year in which such payments are made.

Acts 1974, ch. 726, § 5; 1976, ch. 706, § 2; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(26); T.C.A., § 4-2405; Acts 1981, ch. 227, § 1; 1984, ch. 676, § 1; 2004, ch. 858, §§ 1-3.

Cross-References. Commissioner to promulgate rules and regulations, §4-24-110.

Per diem and travel expenses of members, §56-1-307.

Attorney General Opinions. Per diem for members of commission on firefighting personnel standards and education, OAG 03-079, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 97 (6/20/03).

4-24-106. Duties.

The commission shall:

Certify firetraining instructors;

Certify training and education programs prescribed by the commission;

Recommend and approve curricula for advanced courses and seminars in fire science, fire engineering and training in institutions of higher education or other state supported schools;

Approve all fire services curricula offered through the Tennessee fire services and codes enforcement academy;

Establish classifications based on training and education for full-time or volunteer fire service personnel who desire to be certified and who successfully pass the examination given by the commission; and

Administer the educational incentive provided in part 2 of this chapter.

Acts 1974, ch. 726, § 6; 1979, ch. 258, § 3; T.C.A., § 4-2406; Acts 1988, ch. 1003, § 1; 2004, ch. 427, §§ 2, 3; 2007, ch. 237, § 1.

Cross-References. Recommendations to governor, general assembly, §4-24-102.

Attorney General Opinions. The authority to certify firefighters is vested exclusively in the commission on firefighting personnel standards and education; the Fire Service and Codes Enforcement Academy cannot provide such certification, OAG 01-008, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 10 (1/25/01).

4-24-107. Powers.

The commission may:

Meet at such times and places in the state as may be needed, upon call of the chair or upon the request of five (5) members;

Contract with other agencies, public or private, or persons as it finds necessary for cooperation with city, county, state and federal agencies for training programs;

Make reasonable rules and regulations for the implementation of objectives established in this part;

Employ a director for the purpose of full implementation of this chapter;

Prepare a standard examination to test the levels of training and education of applicants for certification and establish a passing grade therefor;

Develop standards and programs for the administration and distribution of the educational incentive to eligible firefighters pursuant to part 2 of this chapter; and

Certify individuals who are not currently firefighters but who complete a commission approved recruit training program.

Acts 1974, ch. 726, § 7; 1976, ch. 706, § 3; 1979, ch. 258, § 4; T.C.A., § 4-2407; Acts 1988, ch. 1003, § 2; 2004, ch. 427, § 4; 2008, ch. 781, § 1; 2012, ch. 986, § 42.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 48 provided that all rules, regulations, orders, and decisions heretofore issued or promulgated by any of the boards or commissions, which the act terminates or merges into another board or commission, shall remain in full force and effect. In the case of the boards or commissions that are merged with another board or commission by the act, all final rules, regulations, orders, and decisions together with any matters that are pending on October 1, 2012, shall hereafter be administered, enforced, modified, or rescinded in accordance with the law applicable to the continuing board or commission.

Attorney General Opinions. The authority to certify firefighters is vested exclusively in the commission on firefighting personnel standards and education; the Fire Service and Codes Enforcement Academy cannot provide such certification, OAG 01-008, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 10 (1/25/01).

4-24-108. Local governments — Powers unaffected.

Nothing contained in this part shall be deemed to limit the powers, rights, duties and responsibilities of municipal or county governments.

Acts 1974, ch. 726, § 8; T.C.A., § 4-2408.

4-24-109. Funds.

The commission shall operate only on funds appropriated by the general assembly.

Acts 1974, ch. 726, § 9; T.C.A., § 4-2409.

4-24-110. Assistance to local firefighters — Examination and administration.

Individual commission members may assist local firefighting units in the general area of their residence with the development of training and education programs for certification. Members may also administer examinations for certification if such administration is approved by the commission. Members shall receive a per diem payment for each day of attendance at a local firefighting unit as provided for in § 4-24-105, only if such attendance is in lieu of the attendance of a staff employee of the commission.

The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations for the implementation of this section and § 4-24-105. Such rules and regulations shall become effective only upon the approval of the commissioner of commerce and insurance.

Acts 1981, ch. 227, § 2.

Cross-References. Rural fire protection equipment, title 4, ch. 31, part 5.

Attorney General Opinions. Per diem for members of commission on firefighting personnel standards and education, OAG 03-079, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 97 (6/20/03).

4-24-111. Domestic violence training.

The curriculum requirements of the commission on firefighting personnel standards and education shall include materials concerning domestic violence training.

Acts 2001, ch. 3, § 2.

Cross-References. Domestic abuse, title 36, ch. 3, part 6.

Domestic violence state coordinating council, title 38, ch. 12.

4-24-112. Minimum training requirements.

Any full-time, part-time or volunteer firefighter hired or accepted as a firefighter on or after July 1, 2009, by a fire department recognized under title 68, chapter 102, part 3 must meet the following minimum training requirements:

The firefighter must have previously completed or must complete after joining the fire department a minimum of sixteen (16) hours of initial training developed by the Tennessee fire service and codes enforcement academy in firefighting procedures and techniques or complete equivalent training approved by the Tennessee commission on firefighting personnel standards and education before being allowed to actively fight a fire; and

Within thirty-six (36) months after hire or acceptance date as a firefighter, the firefighter must have completed, or must complete after joining the fire department, the basic and live firefighting course offered by the Tennessee fire service and codes enforcement academy or an equivalent course.

The following firefighters are exempt from the training requirements of subsection (a):

Any firefighter in the fire service on July 1, 2009, and who entered the fire service before June 30, 2004; and

Any firefighter who is certified by a medical doctor as medically or physically unable to complete the training requirements; however, the fire department may not allow these firefighters to engage in active firefighting operations.

Any firefighter who is certified by the fire department's chief officer that they will not operate within an environment determined to be immediately dangerous to life and health (IDLH) is exempt from the live firefighting portion of the training referenced in subdivision (a)(2).

Any firefighter in the fire service on July 1, 2009, and who was hired or accepted as a firefighter between July 1, 2004, and June 30, 2009, has until July 1, 2012, to show proof of completion of the minimum training requirements of this section.

The commission on firefighting personnel standards and education may issue any rules and take any other administrative action necessary to implement this section.

The governmental unit, person, organization, agency or entity that obtained a certificate of recognition from the state fire marshal's office for the fire department is authorized to determine whether it or the firefighter shall be responsible for paying any fees charged for or associated with obtaining the training required under this section.

This section shall not apply in counties having the following populations, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, nor to municipalities located within such counties:

not less than nor more than

7,600 7,700

8,050 8,100

11,025 11,100

11,300 11,368

16,000 16,100

17,475 17,575

17,600 17,675

17,700 17,775

17,800 17,875

17,900 18,000

20,600 20,700

22,200 22,300

29,400 29,450

29,800 29,900

39,900 40,000

unless the governing body of any such county or of a municipality located in any such county adopts a resolution of its governing body to apply such requirements within the jurisdictional boundaries of their respective municipality or county, as appropriate; provided, that any action by the county legislative body concerning the implementation of this subdivision (g)(1) shall be limited to the jurisdictional boundaries outside any municipality located within the county. The presiding officer of the governing body shall notify the state fire marshal of the approval of the resolution.

The governing body of any such county or of a municipality located in any such county that has taken the action pursuant to subdivision (g)(1) is authorized to reverse such action by adopting a resolution to exempt their municipality or county from the application of this section within the jurisdictional boundaries of the municipality or county, as appropriate; provided, that any action by the county legislative body concerning its actions shall be limited to the jurisdictional boundaries outside any municipality located within the county. The presiding officer of the governing body shall notify the state fire marshal of the approval of the resolution.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, if a firefighter located in a county or a municipality located within a county to which chapter 661 of the Public Acts of 2010 applies is exempt from meeting the minimum training requirements established pursuant to this section, then the pay supplement authorized pursuant to § 4-24-202 for firefighters completing the in-service training course shall not be available to such a firefighter unless the firefighter meets the minimum training requirements established pursuant to this section.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, if a firefighter located in a county or a municipality located within a county having a population of not less than seventeen thousand seven hundred (17,700) nor more than seventeen thousand seven hundred seventy-five (17,775), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, is exempt from meeting the minimum training requirements established pursuant to this section, then the pay supplement authorized pursuant to § 4-24-202 for firefighters completing the in-service training course shall not be available to such a firefighter unless the firefighter meets the minimum training requirements established pursuant to this section.

This section shall not apply in the unincorporated areas, outside the municipal boundaries of any municipality, in counties having a population of not less than eighty seven thousand nine hundred (87,900) nor more than eighty-eight thousand (88,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, unless the governing body of any such county adopts a resolution to apply such requirements within the jurisdictional boundaries of the county outside any municipality located within the county. The presiding officer of the governing body shall notify the state fire marshal of the approval of the resolution.

The governing body of any such county that has taken the action pursuant to subdivision (h)(1) is authorized to reverse such action by adopting a resolution to exempt their county from the application of this section within the jurisdictional boundaries of the county outside any municipality located within the county. The presiding officer of the governing body shall notify the state fire marshal of the approval of the resolution.

This section shall not apply in counties having the following populations, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, nor to municipalities located within such counties:

not less than nor more than

12,300 12,368

46,800 46,900

Except as provided in subdivision (j)(2), this section shall not apply in the unincorporated areas, outside the municipal boundaries of any municipality in any county having a population of not less than twenty-eight thousand three hundred fifty (28,350) nor more than twenty-eight thousand four hundred fifty (28,450), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

This section shall not apply to any city having a population of not less than two thousand twenty (2,020) nor more than two thousand thirty (2,030), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

This section shall not apply in the unincorporated areas, outside the municipal boundaries of any municipality, in counties having the following populations, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census:

not less than nor more than

4,900 5,000

7,975 8,025

16,600 16,700

19,500 19,775

20,100 20,200

21,100 21,200

39,050 39,150

unless the governing body of any such county adopts a resolution of its governing body to apply such requirements within the jurisdictional boundaries of the county. The presiding officer of the governing body shall notify the state fire marshal of the approval of the resolution.

The governing body of any such county that has taken the action pursuant to subdivision (k)(1) is authorized to reverse the action by adopting a resolution to exempt the county from the application of this section within the jurisdictional boundaries of the county. The presiding officer of the governing body shall notify the state fire marshal of the approval of the resolution.

This section shall not apply in any county having a population of not less than forty-nine thousand (49,000) nor more than forty-nine thousand one hundred (49,100), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, unless the governing body of any such county adopts by a two-thirds (2/3) vote a resolution to apply such requirements within the jurisdictional boundaries of the county. The presiding officer of the governing body shall notify the state fire marshal of the approval of the resolution.

The governing body of any such county that has taken the action pursuant to subdivision (l )(1) is authorized to reverse such action by adopting a resolution to exempt their county from the application of this section. The presiding officer of the governing body shall notify the state fire marshal of the approval of the resolution.

This section shall not apply in counties having the following populations, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census:

not less than nor more than

7,200 7,300

12,826 12,900

unless the governing body of any such county adopts a resolution of its governing body to apply the requirements within the jurisdictional boundaries of the county. The presiding officer of the governing body shall notify the state fire marshal of the approval of the resolution.

The governing body of any such county that has taken the action pursuant to subdivision (m)(1) is authorized to reverse such action by adopting a resolution to exempt the county from the application of this section within the jurisdictional boundaries of the county. The presiding officer of the governing body shall notify the state fire marshal of the approval of the resolution.

This section shall not apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than nor more than

6,700 6,800

7,900 7,970

11,700 11,800

16,500 16,575

The legislative body of any municipality or county that has been exempted from this section may adopt a resolution by a two-thirds (2/3) vote to make this section applicable within the jurisdictional boundaries of their respective municipality or county, as appropriate; provided, that any action by the county legislative body concerning the action shall be limited to the jurisdictional boundaries outside any municipality located within the county. The presiding officer of the governing body shall notify the state fire marshal of the approval of the resolution.

Acts 2009, ch. 512, §§ 1, 3-5; 2010, ch. 661, §§ 1-3; 2010, ch. 1028, §§ 1-14; 2010, ch. 1039, §§ 1, 2; 2013, ch. 310, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Certain sections of Acts 2009, ch. 512 that completely exempted a county from the act by action of the senate were excluded from codification because later actions by the house of representatives excluded the same counties but granted an opt-in provision, and the senate concurred in those actions by the house of representatives.

For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

4-24-113. Administrative functions of the director of the division of fire prevention.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the director of the division of fire prevention shall:

Act as chief administrative officer for the commission;

Employ all consultants, investigators, inspectors, legal counsel and other personnel necessary to staff and carry out the functions of the commission, and assign the personnel in a manner designed to assure their most efficient use;

Provide office space and necessary quarters for the commission;

Maintain a central filing system for official records and documents of the commission;

Promulgate rules and regulations for all administrative functions and activities of the commission;

Enforce all regulations promulgated by the commission;

Collect and account for all fees prescribed to be paid to the commission, and, unless otherwise prescribed by law, deposit the fees in the state treasury, and the commissioner of finance and administration shall make allotments out of the general fund as may be necessary to defray the expenses of the commission as provided by law; and

Perform other duties the commissioner prescribes, or as prescribed by law.

In providing the administrative functions, the director shall consult with the commission, but the decision of the director in such matters shall be conclusive, except as otherwise directed by the commissioner.

Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 43.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 48 provided that all rules, regulations, orders, and decisions heretofore issued or promulgated by any of the boards or commissions, which the act terminates or merges into another board or commission, shall remain in full force and effect. In the case of the boards or commissions that are merged with another board or commission by the act, all final rules, regulations, orders, and decisions together with any matters that are pending on October 1, 2012, shall hereafter be administered, enforced, modified, or rescinded in accordance with the law applicable to the continuing board or commission.